Idaho statutes. Title 47 MINES AND MINING
Chapter 1
INSPECTOR OF MINES

Sec.

§ 47-101. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 47-102. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 47-102A. Definition of the term “mine.” [Repealed.]

§ 47-103. Duties in general. [Repealed.]

§ 47-104. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 47-105. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 47-106. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 47-107. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 47-108. Deputies

Appointment and compensation. [Repealed.]

§ 47-109. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 47-110. Duties of deputies. [Repealed.]

§ 47-111. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 47-112. Mineral exhibit

Duties of inspector. [Repealed.]

§ 47-113. Federal aid. [Repealed.]

§ 47-114. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 47-115. [Amended and Redesignated.]